Utah statutes.
34-32-1.1.   Prohibiting public employers from making payroll deductions for
political purposes.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "Labor organization" means a lawful organization of any kind that is
composed, in whole or in part, of employees and that exists for the purpose,
in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor
disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or other terms and
conditions of employment.
(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(iii), "labor organization"
includes each employee association and union for public employees.
(iii)  "Labor organization" does not include organizations governed by the
National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq. or the Railroad Labor
Act, 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.
(b)  "Political purposes" means an act done with the intent or in a way to
influence or tend to influence, directly or indirectly, any person to refrain
from voting or to vote for or against any candidate for public office at any
caucus, political convention, primary, or election.
(c)  "Public employee" means a person employed by:
(i)  the state of Utah or any administrative subunit of the state;
(ii)  a state institution of higher education; or
(iii)  a municipal corporation, a county, a municipality, a school district, a
local district, a special service district, or any other political subdivision
of the state.
(d)  "Public employer" means an employer that is:
(i)  the state of Utah or any administrative subunit of the state;
(ii)  a state institution of higher education; or
(iii)  a municipal corporation, a county, a municipality, a school district, a
local district, a special service district, or any other political subdivision
of the state.
(e)  "Union dues" means dues, fees, assessments, or other monies required as a
condition of membership or participation in a labor organization.
(2)  A public employer may not deduct from the wages of its employees any
amounts to be paid to:
(a)  a candidate as defined in Section 20A-11-101;
(b)  a personal campaign committee as defined in Section 20A-11-101;
(c)  a political action committee as defined in Section 20A-11-101;
(d)  a political issues committee as defined in Section 20A-11-101;
(e)  a registered political party as defined in Section 20A-11-101;
(f)  a political fund as defined in Section 20A-11-1402; or
(g)  any entity established by a labor organization to solicit, collect, or
distribute monies primarily for political purposes as defined in this chapter.
(3)  The attorney general may bring an action to require a public employer to
comply with the requirements of this section.
